Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,125.05
Mobile cosmetology salon license; renewal.

The procedure for renewing a mobile cosmetology salon license shall be in accordance with section 38-143, except that in addition to all other requirements, the salon shall submit evidence of minimal property damage, bodily injury, and liability insurance coverage for the salon and evidence of coverage which meets the requirements of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act for the salon.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 41.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.